Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-259
Tax; amount authorized; when paid.

The money necessary to defray the town charges of each town shall be levied on the taxable property in such town in the manner prescribed by the Nebraska Budget Act. The rate of taxes for town purposes shall not exceed twenty-eight cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of the taxable property in such township for all purposes subject to approval of the county board. The proceeds of such tax shall be paid by the county treasurer to the town treasurer on or before the fifteenth day of each month or more frequently as provided in section 77-1759.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 58, p. 147;

Laws 1905, c. 53, § 1, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 1043;

C.S.1922, § 945;

Laws 1927, c. 170, § 1, p. 504;

C.S.1929, § 26-259;

R.S.1943, § 23-259;

Laws 1947, c. 65, § 1, p. 214;

Laws 1953, c. 52, § 3, p. 181;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 40, p. 954;

Laws 1957, c. 63, § 1, p. 282;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 14;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 95;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 17;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 40;

Laws 2021, LB41, § 1.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

This section provides for certification by the township and levy of taxes for township purposes by the county board. McDonald v. County of Lincoln, 141 Neb. 741, 4 N.W.2d 903 (1942).